Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.320

Collection of cost of filling cesspools, etc.

Every city of the first class by general ordinance may prescribe the mode and manner of assessing, levying and collecting assessments upon property for filling and closing cesspools thereon and removing garbage, debris, grass, weeds, and brush and provide that the charges therefor shall be a lien on the property upon which such work is done and collected in such manner as is prescribed in the ordinance.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.22.320. Prior: 1907 c 89 s 2; RRS s 8973.]